apertium-pol.pol.dix
<pardef n="gr/oźba__n">
  <e>       <p><l>oźba</l>      <r>oźba<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oźby</l>      <r>oźba<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oźbie</l>     <r>oźba<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oźbę</l>      <r>oźba<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oźbą</l>      <r>oźba<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oźbie</l>     <r>oźba<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oźbo</l>      <r>oźba<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oźby</l>      <r>oźba<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>óźb</l>       <r>oźba<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oźbom</l>     <r>oźba<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oźby</l>      <r>oźba<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oźbami</l>    <r>oźba<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oźbach</l>    <r>oźba<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oźby</l>      <r>oźba<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="Domini/ka__np_ant">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>ka<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/></r></p><par n="BASE__rzeka"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="Agniesz/ka__np">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>ka<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/></r></p><par n="BASE__matka"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="Bea/tka__np_dim">
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r>ta<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="dim"/></r></p><par n="BASE__matka"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="Iz/ka__np_dim">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>a<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="dim"/></r></p><par n="BASE__matka"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="Joan/ka__np_dim">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>na<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="dim"/></r></p><par n="BASE__matka"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="Go/śka__np_dim">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>sia<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="dim"/></r></p><par n="BASE__Gośka"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="A/nia__np">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>nia<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/></r></p><par n="BASE__pustynia"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>niu</l>       <r>nia<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="Ol/a__np">
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>a<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>i</l>         <r>a<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>i</l>         <r>a<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ę</l>         <r>a<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ą</l>         <r>a<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>u</l>         <r>a<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>o</l>         <r>a<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>a<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>a<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>om</l>        <r>a<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ami</l>       <r>a<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ach</l>       <r>a<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>a<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>a<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="Iz/a__np">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>a<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/></r></p><par n="BASE__analiza"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="Nor/a__np">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>a<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/></r></p><par n="BASE__viagra"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="Go/sia__np">
  <e>       <p><l>sia</l>       <r>sia<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>si</l>        <r>sia<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>si</l>        <r>sia<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>się</l>       <r>sia<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sią</l>       <r>sia<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>siu</l>       <r>sia<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sie</l>       <r>sia<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ś</l>         <r>sia<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>siom</l>      <r>sia<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>siami</l>     <r>sia<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>siach</l>     <r>sia<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>si</l>        <r>sia<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sie</l>       <r>sia<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sie</l>       <r>sia<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="mamu/sia__n">
  <e>       <p><l>sia</l>       <r>sia<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>si</l>        <r>sia<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>si</l>        <r>sia<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>się</l>       <r>sia<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sią</l>       <r>sia<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>siu</l>       <r>sia<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sie</l>       <r>sia<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ś</l>         <r>sia<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>siom</l>      <r>sia<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>siami</l>     <r>sia<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>siach</l>     <r>sia<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>si</l>        <r>sia<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sie</l>       <r>sia<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sie</l>       <r>sia<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="groźba">          <i>gr</i><par n="gr/oźba__n"/></e>
<e lm="mamusia">         <i>mamu</i><par n="mamu/sia__n"/></e>
<e lm="Ania">            <i>A</i><par n="A/nia__np"/></e>
<e lm="Agnieszka">       <i>Agniesz</i><par n="Agniesz/ka__np"/></e>
<e lm="Ala">             <i>Al</i><par n="Ol/a__np"/></e>
<e lm="Alma">            <i>Alm</i><par n="Iz/a__np"/></e>
<e lm="Anusia">          <i>Anu</i><par n="Go/sia__np"/></e>
<e lm="Basia">           <i>Ba</i><par n="Go/sia__np"/></e>
<e lm="Blanka">          <i>Blan</i><par n="Agniesz/ka__np"/></e>
<e lm="Bogusia">         <i>Bogu</i><par n="Go/sia__np"/></e>
<e lm="Bohdana">         <i>Bohdan</i><par n="Iz/a__np"/></e>
<e lm="Czesia">          <i>Cze</i><par n="Go/sia__np"/></e>
<e lm="Dana">            <i>Dan</i><par n="Iz/a__np"/></e>
<e lm="Eva">             <i>Ev</i><par n="Iz/a__np"/></e>
<e lm="Gosia">           <i>Go</i><par n="Go/sia__np"/></e>
<e lm="Iva">             <i>Iv</i><par n="Iz/a__np"/></e>
<e lm="Joasia">          <i>Joa</i><par n="Go/sia__np"/></e>
<e lm="Josefa">          <i>Josef</i><par n="Iz/a__np"/></e>
<e lm="Kasia">           <i>Ka</i><par n="Go/sia__np"/></e>
<e lm="Katka">           <i>Kat</i><par n="Agniesz/ka__np"/></e>
<e lm="Kristýna">        <i>Kristýn</i><par n="Iz/a__np"/></e>
<e lm="Krysia">          <i>Kry</i><par n="Go/sia__np"/></e>
<e lm="Marianna">        <i>Mariann</i><par n="Iz/a__np"/></e>
<e lm="Nora">            <i>Nor</i><par n="Nor/a__np"/></e>
<e lm="Ola">             <i>Ol</i><par n="Ol/a__np"/></e>
<e lm="Roma">            <i>Rom</i><par n="Iz/a__np"/></e>
<e lm="Stasia">          <i>Sta</i><par n="Go/sia__np"/></e>
<e lm="Tola">            <i>Tol</i><par n="Ol/a__np"/></e>
<e lm="Wacława">         <i>Wacław</i><par n="Iz/a__np"/></e>
<e lm="Zdzisia">         <i>Zdzi</i><par n="Go/sia__np"/></e>
<e lm="Angelika">        <i>Angeli</i><par n="Domini/ka__np_ant"/></e>
<e lm="Dominika">        <i>Domini</i><par n="Domini/ka__np_ant"/></e>
<e lm="Eryka">           <i>Ery</i><par n="Domini/ka__np_ant"/></e>
<e lm="Fryderyka">       <i>Frydery</i><par n="Domini/ka__np_ant"/></e>
<e lm="Ludwika">         <i>Ludwi</i><par n="Domini/ka__np_ant"/></e>
<e lm="Monika">          <i>Moni</i><par n="Domini/ka__np_ant"/></e>
<e lm="Weronika">        <i>Weroni</i><par n="Domini/ka__np_ant"/></e>
<e lm="Adrianna">        <i>Adrian</i><par n="Joan/ka__np_dim"/></e>
<e lm="Alberta">         <i>Alber</i><par n="Bea/tka__np_dim"/></e>
<e lm="Anna">            <i>An</i><par n="Joan/ka__np_dim"/></e>
<e lm="Anita">           <i>Ani</i><par n="Bea/tka__np_dim"/></e>
<e lm="Anusia">          <i>Anu</i><par n="Go/śka__np_dim"/></e>
<e lm="Basia">           <i>Ba</i><par n="Go/śka__np_dim"/></e>
<e lm="Balbina">         <i>Balbin</i><par n="Iz/ka__np_dim"/></e>
<e lm="Beata">           <i>Bea</i><par n="Bea/tka__np_dim"/></e>
<e lm="Bogusia">         <i>Bogu</i><par n="Go/śka__np_dim"/></e>
<e lm="Carolina">        <i>Carolin</i><par n="Iz/ka__np_dim"/></e>
<e lm="Charlotta">       <i>Charlot</i><par n="Bea/tka__np_dim"/></e>
<e lm="Czesia">          <i>Cze</i><par n="Go/śka__np_dim"/></e>
<e lm="Edita">           <i>Edi</i><par n="Bea/tka__np_dim"/></e>
<e lm="Elena">           <i>Elen</i><par n="Iz/ka__np_dim"/></e>
<e lm="Evita">           <i>Evi</i><par n="Bea/tka__np_dim"/></e>
<e lm="Gina">            <i>Gin</i><par n="Iz/ka__np_dim"/></e>
<e lm="Gosia">           <i>Go</i><par n="Go/śka__np_dim"/></e>
<e lm="Hanna">           <i>Han</i><par n="Joan/ka__np_dim"/></e>
<e lm="Honorata">        <i>Honora</i><par n="Bea/tka__np_dim"/></e>
<e lm="Irmina">          <i>Irmin</i><par n="Iz/ka__np_dim"/></e>
<e lm="Jaroslava">       <i>Jaroslav</i><par n="Iz/ka__np_dim"/></e>
<e lm="Joasia">          <i>Joa</i><par n="Go/śka__np_dim"/></e>
<e lm="Joanna">          <i>Joan</i><par n="Joan/ka__np_dim"/></e>
<e lm="Judita">          <i>Judi</i><par n="Bea/tka__np_dim"/></e>
<e lm="Julianna">        <i>Julian</i><par n="Joan/ka__np_dim"/></e>
<e lm="Kasia">           <i>Ka</i><par n="Go/śka__np_dim"/></e>
<e lm="Katarina">        <i>Katarin</i><par n="Iz/ka__np_dim"/></e>
<e lm="Krysia">          <i>Kry</i><par n="Go/śka__np_dim"/></e>
<e lm="Lilianna">        <i>Lilian</i><par n="Joan/ka__np_dim"/></e>
<e lm="Magdalena">       <i>Magdalen</i><par n="Iz/ka__np_dim"/></e>
<e lm="Margita">         <i>Margi</i><par n="Bea/tka__np_dim"/></e>
<e lm="Marianna">        <i>Marian</i><par n="Joan/ka__np_dim"/></e>
<e lm="Mona">            <i>Mon</i><par n="Iz/ka__np_dim"/></e>
<e lm="Rita">            <i>Ri</i><par n="Bea/tka__np_dim"/></e>
<e lm="Stasia">          <i>Sta</i><par n="Go/śka__np_dim"/></e>
<e lm="Teresa">          <i>Teres</i><par n="Iz/ka__np_dim"/></e>
<e lm="Zdzisia">         <i>Zdzi</i><par n="Go/śka__np_dim"/></e>
<e lm="Zuzanna">         <i>Zuzan</i><par n="Joan/ka__np_dim"/></e>
